Washington statutes.
RCW 35.16.070

Previously granted franchises in excluded territory.

In regard to franchises previously granted for operation of any public service business or facility within the territory excluded from a city or town by proceedings under this chapter, the rights, obligations, and duties of the legislative body of the county or other political subdivision having jurisdiction over such territory and of the franchise holder shall be as provided in RCW 35.02.160, relating to inclusion of territory by an incorporation.

[ 1994 c 273 s 6.]